Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.235

Public works contracts—Unit priced contracts—When authorized—Bidding requirements.

(1) The following public bodies of the state of Washington are authorized to procure public works contracts under this chapter for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades:

(a) Every county public transportation authority as defined under RCW 36.57.010;

(b) Every public transportation benefit area as defined under RCW 36.57A.010; and

(c) Every regional transit authority as defined under RCW 81.112.020.

(2) A public body may procure public works with a unit priced contract under this section for the purpose of completing anticipated types of work based on hourly rates or unit pricing for one or more categories of work or trades.

(3) Unit priced contracts must be executed for an initial contract term not to exceed one year, with the public body having the option of extending or renewing the unit priced contract for one additional year.

(4) Invitations for unit price bids must include, for purposes of the bid evaluation, estimated quantities of the anticipated types of work or trades, and specify how the public body will issue or release work assignments, work orders, or task authorizations pursuant to a unit priced contract for projects, tasks, or other work based on the hourly rates or unit prices bid by the contractor. Contracts must be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as provided in RCW 39.04.010. Whenever possible, the public body must invite at least one proposal from a certified minority or woman contractor who otherwise qualifies under this section.

(5) Unit priced contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work order must be the prevailing wage rates in effect at the beginning date for each contract year. Unit priced contracts must have prevailing wage rates updated annually. Intents and affidavits for prevailing wages paid must be submitted annually for all work completed within the previous twelve-month period of the unit priced contract.

(6) All public works procured with a unit priced contract under this section must comply with all other applicable bid requirements.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "unit priced contract" means a competitively bid contract in which public works are anticipated on a recurring basis to meet the business or operational needs of the public body, under which the contractor agrees to a fixed period indefinite quantity delivery of work, at a defined unit price for each category of work.

[ 2019 c 434 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 434: See note following RCW 35.23.352.